Mississippi statutes. Title 33. Military Affairs
Article 1. Organization, Training and Discipline.

§ 33-7-1.
Composition and organization of the Mississippi National Guard.

The Mississippi National Guard shall consist of the organized militia within the ages prescribed by federal law and regulations, organized, armed and equipped as hereinafter provided, and of commissioned officers and warrant officers within the ages and having the qualifications prescribed by federal law and regulations. The number of officers and enlisted men of the National Guard and the grades and designations thereof shall be as now or hereafter prescribed by federal law and regulations relating to the National Guard, and all commissions and promotions shall be in accordance with the aforesaid regulations.

The Mississippi National Guard shall be divided into such organizations and units as may now or hereafter be prescribed for this state by federal law or regulations, consisting of that portion of the National Guard of the United States apportioned and assigned to this state in accordance with tables of organizations prescribed by the department of defense and approved by the Governor of Mississippi.

The Governor shall have power to increase the National Guard by voluntary enlistment or by draft, and to organize the same, with proper officers, as the necessities of the service may require, in the manner provided for in Sections 33-5-1 through 33-5-17 of Chapter 5 of this title, in periods of national or state emergency as therein provided for.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-31; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 20, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-3.
Training and discipline.

Every unit of the Mississippi National Guard and the individual members thereof shall, unless excused by proper authority, participate in such field training, armory drills, training assemblies, inspections, musters, ceremonies, parades and other military training or military duty as may be prescribed by the laws and regulations of the United States relating to the National Guard or prescribed by the laws of this state or by the order of the Governor. The discipline of the National Guard shall conform to the system of discipline which is now or may hereafter be prescribed by the United States government for the National Guard, or where applicable for the active Armed Forces of the United States, and the training shall be conducted so as to conform to the applicable regulations of the United States governing training of the National Guard. Any officer, warrant officer or enlisted man who shall fail to report for or participate in or perform any such training, drill, assembly, inspection, muster, ceremony, parade or other military duty, after having first been ordered by his superior officer so to do and not having been excused therefrom by proper authority, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or by imprisonment not to exceed thirty (30) days, or by both fine and imprisonment. For purposes of this section, a person shall be deemed to have been ordered to report for, participate in and perform military training or military duty if the same has been scheduled and notice thereof given to members of the unit in the manner prescribed by applicable regulations and customs of the service. Any member of the National Guard shall have an opportunity to explain any mitigating circumstances which may have caused an unauthorized absence under this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-33; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 22; Laws, 1989, ch. 473, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 33-7-5.
Efficiency of troops; officers responsible for.

The commander in chief of the organized militia of this state may cause those officers under his command to perform any military duty, and they shall be responsible to the Governor for the general efficiency of the organized militia and for the inspection, training, instruction, military proficiency, and care of the troops. The commanding officers of organizations shall be responsible to their immediate commanders for the condition of the equipment, drill, instruction, and efficiency of their respective commands. All commissioned officers, and warrant officers, and enlisted men shall be responsible to their immediate commanding officers for prompt and unhesitating obedience, proper drill, and the preservation and proper use of the property of the United States, state, organization and other public property in their possession.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-34; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 23, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-7.
Governor may order troops beyond borders of state for instruction.

The commander in chief is authorized to order out the Mississippi National Guard, or any part thereof, for training or service beyond the borders of the state, with any part of the Armed Forces of the United States, whenever participation in such training or serving is authorized by the secretary of defense, or to repel invasion. Whenever the Mississippi National Guard, or any part thereof, not being in the service of the United States, goes beyond the limits of the state, they shall still remain under the military laws and regulations of the state, and any military court of the state shall have jurisdiction over any offense against the military laws of the state committed by any member of the Mississippi National Guard while performing any such military duty beyond the limits of the state, whether such court be organized and sit in the state or not.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-35; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 24, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-9.
Field training under command of officers of other states.

For the purpose of coordinating and making more effective the field and similar classes of instruction and training in organizations of the National Guard jointly maintained by Mississippi and any other state or states during periods of field or similar training, as provided under the National Defense Act, the units and personnel of the Mississippi National Guard may, if authorized by the federal government, be placed under the supervision and command of higher organization commanders, who are now or may hereafter be appointed from other states, and whose appointments have the approval of this state, and the states concerned, and such officer is federally recognized. This requirement shall not be carried out unless and until the state or states jointly interested in a National Guard organization with Mississippi shall have enacted a similar law. The objects of this section may be carried out with the consent of the Governor, without regard to similar laws enacted by other states, with the advice and approval of the ranking officer of the Mississippi National Guard present at the place of training and instruction and in command of the Mississippi troops concerned. For the purpose of fixing the time limits of the periods mentioned in this section, the periods of training shall begin when units have cleared their armories or bases and are en route to training assembly areas and shall end when units have returned to their armories or bases from field training period. Mississippi troops shall not be required to yield authority and supervision of matters concerning transportation in or out of the camp or other military area, finance, and supply which concern Mississippi only in her relations with the federal government and for which the state is directly responsible to the federal government. The commanding officer appointed from another state, and such other officers of his command as he may designate, who are members of organizations in which Mississippi has joint interest in other states, and who are appointed and recognized in accordance with laws, rules and regulations prescribed by the federal government may, with the approval of the Governor, make tours of inspection and policy visits with the units of their organizations of the National Guard of Mississippi at their home stations or at other places, at such times as are mutually agreeable, it being understood that the state is not responsible or liable for any expenses incident to such visits.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-36; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 25, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-11.
Oaths.

Those who are appointed, commissioned, warranted, or enlisted or drafted in the active militia or state military forces shall take and subscribe an oath as prescribed in appropriate laws and regulations governing the Armed Forces of the United States and the military forces of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-37; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 26, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-13.
The uniform.

The uniform of the Mississippi National Guard shall be the same as that prescribed for the Armed Forces of the United States, except that the commander in chief may authorize the use of other distinctive insignia.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-38; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 27, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-15.
Unauthorized wearing of uniform and insignia.

It shall be unlawful for any person not a member of the Mississippi National Guard or the organized militia to wear any distinctive part of the uniform or insignia of the Mississippi National Guard or the organized militia. Any person who offends against this section shall, on conviction, be punished by a fine of not less than Ten Dollars ($10.00), and not more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed three (3) months, or by both fine and imprisonment. However, the prohibition of this section shall not apply to members of the armed forces on extended active duty or to members of the various reserve components of the armed forces.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-39; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 28, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-17.
Arms and equipment.

All officers and men of the Mississippi National Guard shall be furnished with such arms and equipment as are prescribed by the federal government for the proper performance of their military duty. These supplies and such equipage as may be necessary for the proper equipment of all organizations will be issued, under such regulations as the commander in chief may prescribe, upon approved requisitions.

Every officer and enlisted man shall be responsible for the care, safekeeping, and return of any uniform, arms or any other military property delivered to him for his use. He shall use the same for military purposes only, and upon receiving a discharge or otherwise leaving the military service, or upon the demand of his commanding officer, or other military authority, shall forthwith deliver such uniform, arm, or other military property to an officer competent to receive same, the property so turned in to be in good order, reasonable use and ordinary wear thereof excepted. Any person violating the provisions of this section will be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction before any court of competent jurisdiction, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six (6) months, or both such fine and imprisonment, or he may be punished as a court-martial may direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-40; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 29, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-19.
Penalty for loss, destruction or retention of military property.

Every person who shall wantonly, carelessly, intentionally or through neglect, lose, injure or destroy, or permit the loss, injury or destruction of any uniform, part of uniform, arm, equipment or other article of military property issued by the United States or State of Mississippi for military purposes, or the property of any organization of the Mississippi National Guard, and refuse or fail to make good such loss, or who shall sell or dispose of, remove or secrete the same with the intent to sell or dispose thereof, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof before a court of competent jurisdiction, shall be punished by a fine of not exceeding Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00), or by imprisonment not exceeding six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment, at the discretion of the court.

Whosoever wrongfully purchases, retains, or who has in his possession any arm, accouterment, article of uniform, tool, implement, or any other military property, the property of the United States, the State of Mississippi or of any organization of the Mississippi National Guard, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof before a court of competent jurisdiction shall be fined not exceeding Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00), or imprisoned not exceeding six months (6), or both, at the discretion of the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-41; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 30, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-21.
Federal pay for National Guard.

Whenever the Mississippi National Guard, or any part thereof, attends field training, armory drills, training assemblies, or other military training or military duty for which federal funds are available, they shall receive such pay and allowances as may be allowed them by the federal government to be paid out of federal funds appropriated for the use of the Mississippi National Guard.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-42; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 31, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-23.
Compensation for inspections and other duties.

The Adjutant General may order any officer or enlisted man of the Mississippi National Guard to make inspections, or perform any other military activity connected with the administration of the Mississippi National Guard. When any such officer or enlisted man shall be called upon to perform such inspection or military activity he shall receive such pay as is provided for active state duty and mileage and other allowances as provided in Section 25-3-41 of the Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-43; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 32, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-25.
Commanding officer may fix limits to military jurisdiction.

Any commanding officer, when on duty, may fix the necessary limits or bounds to his unit’s parade, armory building, camp, base, post or area. No person shall enter such limits without leave, and said commanding officer at any parade, camp, base, post, or area may refuse to any person entrance to any such military installation, area, or building in which troops may be quartered, or military equipment stored, whenever, in his judgment, the exigencies of the service make it expedient to do so. Whoever intrudes within the limits of any such parade, camp, base, area, armory or building in which troops are quartered, after being forbidden entrance therein, may be ejected forcibly if necessary, or may be confined under guard as provided for in Section 33-1-11. Whoever resists a sentry or any authorized member of the Mississippi National Guard endeavoring to exclude them from such limits or building, or who resists arrest by the military authorities within such limits or building shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine not less than Ten Dollars ($10.00) and not more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), or by imprisonment not to exceed sixty (60) days, or by both fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-44; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 33, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-27.
Continuance in National Guard after federal service.

Upon the termination of any emergency for which the Mississippi National Guard has been drafted into the military service of the United States, all enlisted men so drafted, upon being discharged from the Armed Forces of the United States shall continue to serve in the Mississippi National Guard until the dates upon which their enlistments prior to their draft, would have expired, if uninterrupted. The commissioned and warranted officers so drafted shall resume their commissions and warrants in the Mississippi National Guard in the respective grades held by them when drafted, or in any higher grade which they may have attained while in such service, if appointed thereto by the Governor to fill existing vacancies.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-45; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 34, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-7-29.
Colors and flag to be furnished.

Each unit of the Mississippi National Guard which has a comparable unit in the Armed Forces of the United States to which is furnished the national colors and a unit flag shall be furnished by the Adjutant General with the national colors and the unit flag.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-46; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 35, eff from and after June 1, 1966.